Data Privacy Policy: www.jmberlin.de
Draft of 4 July 2022
1. General
a) Administrator and Subject
The company responsible for collecting, processing and using your personal data within the meaning of the German Federal Data Protection Act (Bundesdatenschutzgesetz) is
Stiftung Jüdisches Museum Berlin
Lindenstraße 9-14
10969 Berlin
The webpages of the Jewish Museum Berlin include all the pages of the website, the Online Collections area at
objekte.jmberlin.de
and the blog at
http://www.jmberlin.de/blog-en/
(hereinafter referred to as the “Webpages”), as well as the Online Shop at
shop.jmberlin.de
(hereinafter referred to as the “Online Shop”).
b) Overview: Purposes of Data Collection
To the extent you use, merely by reading, our web offerings, we collect personal data for the following purposes, which are described in more detail under sections 2 through 5 below:
2.
Transmission of online content
,
3.
Security of our technical systems
,
4.
Improvement of our online offerings
,
5.
Transmission of third-party offerings
Over and above the information we provide for you to read, our website makes certain service offerings available. From those who wish to use these additional services, we require additional personal data. These offerings, described in more detail below, include:
6.
Comment functions on the Blog and in our Online Collections
,
7.
Newsletter
,
8.
Contact for other purposes
,
9.
Press release mailing list.
10.
Orders in the Online-Shop of the Jewish Museum Berlin
11.
Donate via Fundraise Up
Additional functions:
c) Your Rights
You have the right – subject to a few exceptions – to require information from us at any time about the data we have saved concerning you, as well as a right, under certain circumstances, to demand the correction, blockage, or deletion of data.
Where you have provided your consent to any procedure, you moreover have the right to revoke such consent.
If you wish to object, or revoke your consent, to the collection, processing, or use of your personal data pursuant to this Data Privacy Policy, whether in whole or for specific measures, you may e-mail, fax or post your objection or revocation of consent to the following address:
dacuro GmbH
Thomas Stegemann
External Data Protection Officer
Otto-Hahn-Straße 3
69190 Walldorf
T +49 (0) 6227 78 93 930
F +49 (0) 6227 78 93 939
datenschutz.extern@jmberlin.de
We shall review your request on a case by case basis and provide you either with the information requested or with a written explanation for our not providing it.
d) Supervisory Authority
Of course, you also have the right to file a
complaint
with the
competent supervisory authority
.
2. Transmission of Online Content
a) Purpose and Data
For the purpose of transmitting the web pages you have selected, your browser must typically send, among other things, the following information (as content of an HTTP-Request):
your IP-address, that is, a series of numbers which identifies your current computer connection to the internet,
the web page you have selected,
information about the browser and operating system you are using, as well as
Cookies. We also use cookies on our Webpages to make our website overall more user-friendly, effective and secure. Cookies are small files that are saved on your data storage device and that store specific settings and data that are exchanged between your browser and our system. Furthermore, cookies allow us, for instance, to measure how often pages are accessed and how visitors navigate our website in general. Please be advised that our server transmits some of these cookies to your computer system; these are mostly “session cookies.” Session cookies are automatically deleted from your hard drive once the browser session ends. Other cookies remain on your computer system and allow us to recognize your computer system the next time you visit (so-called “persistent cookies”). You may of course disable cookies at any time, provided your browser supports this function. In the event cookies are disabled, however, the functionality of our website for you may be restricted.
b) Basis in Law
The aforementioned categories of data are required for transmission of the content you have selected and for optimization of our interface. Such use of your data is justified by our legitimate interest in transmitting information to you upon your request.
c) Data Transmission and Rights of Access
Rights of access are governed by our various internal access policies and by the relevant written agreements we have concluded with our service providers.
d) Term of Storage
Once the transmission of information has been completed, we no longer store the data we have collected from you for this purpose (in certain cases, however, we may store it for the purposes set forth below).
3. Security of Our Technical Systems
a) Purpose and Categories of Data
Moreover, we collect the categories of data already set forth above:
your IP-address, that is, a series of numbers which identifies your current computer connection to the internet,
the web page you have selected,
information about the browser and operating system your are using, such as its name and version, as well as
where relevant, the page from which you came to our Webpages (so-called “Referrer-Information”).
b) Basis in Law
Such storage of your data is justified by our legitimate interest in conducting an analysis of any errors in or attacks on our technical systems.
c) Data Transmission and Rights of Access
Rights of access are governed by our various internal access policies and by the relevant written agreements we have concluded with our service providers.
d) Term of Storage
The data so described are deleted – provided no breach of security has been detected – within seven days. In the event of a breach, they are deleted as soon as we no longer have a legitimate interest in continuing to store them.
e) Your Rights
In general, rights of information and correction exist with respect to the categories of data set forth above. In most cases, however, the connection to a person can be made only via his IP-address. We are nevertheless obligated to ensure that we provide information only to persons actually entitled to it. If you request information from us, therefore, you must adequately demonstrate that the information refers to you.
4. Improvement of Our Online Offerings (through website traffic statistics)
Our Webpages use
Matomo
, an open source web analytics application published under the GNU General Public License (available at
matomo.org
; on data privacy, see in particular:
matomo.org/privacy
(hereinafter referred to as “
Matomo
”).
Matomo
uses a cookie to analyze your user behavior when you visit our Webpages.
The cookie, which is stored on your computer when you visit the Webpages, also saves and transmits your masked IP address. This means that when the data is transmitted to our server, the IP address is anonymized in such a way that we cannot identify you as a visitor of our website. The analysis serves only to help us optimize and enhance our website.
a) Purpose and Categories of Data
For the purpose of improving our online offerings, we evaluate how the Webpages are used. To this end, we refer to the following information, in particular from the HTTP-Request mentioned under (a) above:
your IP-address, that is, a series of numbers which identifies your current computer connection to the internet,
the Webpage you have selected,
information about the browser and operating system your are using, as well as
where relevant, the page from which you came to our Webpages (so-called “Referrer-Information”).
Moreover, we track a pseudonymous marker which is stored on your computer when you visit our Webpages (HTTP-Cookie). This makes it possible for us to recognize our users.
b) Basis in Law
Such processing of your data in the categories named above is justified by our legitimate interest in improving our online presence.
c) Data Transmission and Rights of Access
Rights of access are governed by our various internal access policies and by the relevant written agreements we have concluded with our service providers.
d) Term of Storage
Personal data are rendered anonymous immediately upon collection.
e) Your Rights
You may configure your browser to prevent the cookie from being installed. Please be advised, however, that, if you do so, you may not be able to make full use of all the features available on our Webpages.
You may furthermore prevent the cookie-generated data based on your usage of these Webpages (including your IP address) from being collected and processed by using the Matomo-Opt-Out-Function. Your browser then creates an “opt-out cookie,” preventing Matomo from collecting usage data. Please note: Deleting your browser's cookies also deletes the opt-out cookie.
Click here and opt directly out of Matomo:
In general, you have no right to information about, correction of, or deletion of this data, because your data are collected pursuant to a process of anonymization, which usually renders it impossible for us to reproduce, at any reasonable expense, a connection to the person seeking information. You are, however, welcome to submit an application of this kind to us. We shall review your request on a case by case basis and evaluate whether it might not be possible to comply with it after all. If not, we shall provide a written explanation for why we cannot.
5. Transmission of Third-Party Offers
a) Share-Function
Further, our Webpages include links to our internet presence on the platforms
Facebook (
www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
),
Google+ (
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de
),
Instagram (
https://help.instagram.com/155833707900388
),
Twitter (
https://twitter.com/en/privacy
) and
YouTube (
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de
).
Clicking on these links does not result in any direct transmission of data to the servers of these service providers by us. You can visit the profiles of the Jewish Museum Berlin on these social networks to find out about the latest activities and topics related to the Jewish Museum Berlin, leave comments, and connect with us and other users. Your opinion is important to us, which is why we welcome constructive comments that promote spirited discussions. We kindly ask that you treat each other with respect and that you comply with our
netiquette
.
b) Linked Videos
Our Webpages include embedded videos from the video-sharing websites YouTube and Vimeo. To the extent you use these services, the collection and use of data will be governed by the applicable privacy protection guidelines of those firms.
For more information about the data privacy policies of YouTube and Vimeo, see:
Youtube (
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de
) and
Vimeo (
vimeo.com/privacy
).
The YouTube videos include cookies set by the provider YouTube LLC, 901 Cherry Ave, San Bruno, CA 94066, USA. These cookies expire after a maximum of two years.
6. Comment Functions on the Blog and in Our Online Collections
You can leave comments on our Blog (
Blogerim – From the corridors of the Jewish Museum Berlin
) and in our Online Collections. As with comments posted on social networks, we request that you comply, in making any comments, with the
netiquette
.
This page allows you to post
your name,
your e-mail address, and
your comment.
We will publish your name and comment after your post is approved. Your e-mail address is not published and is collected only to prevent abuses. The processing of your data is in this case based upon your consent.
We will delete your Blog comment if you send a request to this effect to
blog@jmberlin.de
.
We will delete your Online Collection comment if you send a request to this effect to
website@jmberlin.de
.
7. Newsletter
If you would like to subscribe to the newsletter we offer over our website, we need an e-mail address from you as well as information allowing us to confirm that you are the owner of the address provided and that you consent to receiving our newsletter.
To ensure that our sending of the newsletter is conducted in accordance with your consent, we use the so-called double-opt-in-procedure. This procedure foresees that the potential subscriber initially registers for our distribution list. In a second step, the user receives a confirmation e-mail giving him the opportunity to confirm his registration in a legally reliable manner. The user’s address is actively incorporated into our distribution list only once this confirmation is received. We use these data exclusively for the purpose of sending the information and offers requested.
Our newsletter uses the software product
Sendinblue
. In this connection, your data are transmitted to the firm Sendinblue GmbH. Sendinblue is prohibited from selling your data or otherwise using it except in connection with the sending of newsletters.
Sendinblue ist a German, certified service-provider that operates in accordance with the requirements of the European General Data Protection Regulation and the German Federal Data Protection Act. You will find further information here:
https://www.sendinblue.com/information-for-email-recipients
.
You can revoke at any time the consent you provide to our storage of your data and e-mail address, as well as to our use of such data for the purpose of sending the newsletter. To do so, please use the “unsubscribe”-link found in the newsletter.
The measures taken for compliance with legal provisions on data privacy are subject to technical improvements on an ongoing basis. For this reason, we request that you inform yourself at regular intervals concerning our data protection measures by reviewing our online data protection policy statement.
8. Contact for Other Purposes
You may contact us by e-mail, online contact-form, fax, telephone, or in person, e.g., for the purpose of
giving us feedback,
making a request,
or registering for events, archive and library visits.
In this context, we store the content of your contact request and your contact details in our data files, in most cases on the basis of your consent or for the purpose of preparing and carrying out a legal transaction with you, but in some cases on the basis of our legitimate interest in processing such data.
We pass on your data when your request requires that we do so, based either on the context or in consequence of an exchange with you.
Your personal data will be deleted upon completion of the procedure in question, provided we have no duty to retain it and no longer have a legitimate interest in retaining it.
9. Press Release Mailing List
We maintain a mailing list for the purpose of providing information to interested members of the press. In this mailing list, the following information is stored:
name,
address,
contact data, in particular telephone number and e-mail address,
press medium(s), membership in the editorial team,
subjects of interest.
We generally store this data pursuant to your registration and on the basis of your consent, but in some cases on the basis of our legitimate interest in informing the public about our activities. We pass on your data only to service providers within the framework of service agreements. We do not pass on data to third parties for any other reason.
Your data will be deleted at any time upon your request.
10. Orders in the Online-Shop of the Jewish Museum Berlin
a) Purpose and Data
Our Online-Shop enables you to acquire certain products, such as entrance tickets and gift certificates, or to sign up for events at the Museum. Moreover, you have the option – if you plan to use the Online-Shop regularly – of setting up a customer account.
For this purpose, we process – besides the general data which are in any event collected when you visit the Online-Shop (see above) – the following additional data:
Name and E-Mail address, as well as preferred language (German or English)
In the event of registration for a customer account: also your mailing address and a password defined by you, provided that the password itself is not saved on a permanent basis – instead, we save only a checksum (hash value)
The products you have chosen to order, including their cost
Any commentary that you may add to your order
The method of payment you select for your order and later information concerning settlement of the payment
These data may be used to an appropriate extent for marketing purposes, as well.
b) Basis in law
The aforementioned categories of data are collected and processed by us for the purpose of preparing and performing a contract with you.
Moreover – to the extent a purchase contract is concluded – the resulting booking records are saved as required by law pursuant to § 147 Para. 1 No. 4 of the German Tax Code (Abgabenordnung).
The use of your data for marketing purposes is justified by our legitimate interest in making our offerings as attractive as possible and in advertizing them.
c) Data transmission and rights of access
Rights of access are governed by our various internal access policies and by the corresponding written service agreements we have concluded with our service providers.
The Foundation for the Jewish Museum Berlin is moreover entitled to transmit the data it has collected to any third parties it may have engaged for the purpose of selling tickets or handling your participation in an event, provided it shall transmit only such data and these data only to such exent as shall be necessary for the purpose. We assure you that both the Foundation for the Jewish Museum itself and any third parties it may engage shall use customer data on a strictly confidential basis.
It is sometimes necessary, in the context of events produced in cooperation with other institutions and organizations, to transmit data on reservations to these partners. To the extent this may be the case, we shall inform you separately of this fact in the course of your registration for the event.
d) Storage period
To the extent you conclude a purchase contract in our Online-Shop, we are required by law to save the corresponding booking records for a period of ten years. Thereafter, these records are deleted.
To the extent that you register for the regular use of our Online-Shop, your customer account shall be deleted when it is closed or when we for our part cease to offer that service.
In all other cases, your data shall be deleted pursuant to an appropriate cycle of deletion, not later than at the end of the second full year commencing after your data were collected.
11. Donate via Fundraise Up
Our website uses the online giving platform Fundraise Up (Fundraise Up Inc., 219 36th Street, Unit 4, Suite A100, Brooklyn, New York 11232 USA, hereinafter referred to as “Fundraise Up”) to generate donations.
We use data collected in this context (e.g. your name, email address, IP address, shortened payment card number and CVC code) for the purpose of your donation in accordance with Article 6(1)(ii)(b) of the GDPR in conjunction with Article 9(2)(d) of GDPR. We also process your data (name and email address) on the basis of our legitimate interests pursuant to Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR, in order to contact you about other marketing campaigns.
Fundraise Up uses third-party payment services to transfer donations. When you donate via Fundraise Up, your details (e.g. name, amount of payment, account details, credit card number) are processed by the payment services provider for the purposes of that transaction. Such transactions are governed by the contractual provisions and privacy policy of the provider in question. The use of payment services providers is based on Article 6(1)(b) of the GDPR (performance of a contract) and in the interest of ensuring payments proceed as smoothly, easily and securely as possible (GDPR Article 6(1)(f)).
The transfer of data to the USA is based on the EU Commission’s standard contractual clauses. Details are available here:
https://fundraiseup.com/terms/
Further information on data processing is available at:
https://fundraiseup.com/privacy/
Order processing agreement
We have concluded an order processing agreement (abbreviated to AVV in German) with regard to the use of the above-named service. This is a contract required by data protection law, which ensures that the personal data of our website users is only processed in accordance with our instructions and in compliance with the GDPR.
Share, Newsletter, Feedback
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://matomo.org/privacy/:
Skip to content
Menu
MENU
MENU
Why Matomo?
100% Data Ownership
Privacy Protection
Product Features
Open Source
Flexibility
No Data Sampling
GDPR
Google Analytics Alternative
Use Cases
Complete Analytics
Intranet Analytics
Consent-Free Tracking
Tracking Personal Data
Marketing Attribution
No Limitations
Log Analytics
Cloud
On-Premise
Matomo On-Premise
On-Premise vs Cloud
Download for free
Marketplace
Support Plans
Pricing
Pricing
Contact Sales
Resources
NEW! 2025 Ethical Marketing Field Guide
Help
Blog
Guides
Masterclasses
Case Studies
Integrations
Contact the Matomo team
List of all features
Get involved
Log in
Help
TRY IT FOR FREE
Matomo ensures the privacy of your users and analytics data
Get 100% data ownership and privacy protection with Matomo Analytics.
One of Matomo's guiding principles: respecting privacy
Matomo Analytics was designed with privacy in mind. It can be configured to follow even the strictest of privacy laws – like
GDPR
,
HIPAA
,
CCPA
, LGPD and PECR. Simply by using Matomo you will ensure all of your valuable information is private and owned by one person (you!) and that your website respects your visitors’ privacy. If you
need to have data stored in a specific country and are looking for additional data sovereignty, you can achieve this with Matomo On-Premise.
The source code of the software is open-source so hundreds of people have reviewed it to ensure it is secure and keeps your data private.
Ways Matomo protects the privacy of your users and customers
Although Matomo Analytics is a web analytics software with a purpose to track user activity on your website, we take privacy very seriously.
The following advanced privacy protections in Matomo provide you with more control:
Matomo has an opt-out mechanism which
lets users opt-out of web analytics tracking
You can configure for data retention of raw data and aggregated reports
Anonymise IP addresses
as well as implementing other
data anonymisation techniques
Respect
DoNotTrack setting
Configure Matomo to
not process any personal data or PII (personally identifiable information)
Set shorter expiration dates for tracking cookies
Disable Visits Log and Visitor Profile
Users aren’t tracked across websites unless specifically enabled
Matomo can be used without needing consent (unlike with Google, which will always need user consent). This strengthens privacy as it means you’re not ‘following’ visitors (e.g. over multiple days)
Read about the
12 ways Matomo helps you protect your visitor’s privacy
These privacy features, along with the open and decentralised nature of Matomo, mean your users’ privacy is respected.
"As one of the leading secure and private email solutions mailfence.com attaches the utmost importance to security and respect for privacy.  We therefore selected Matomo as our open source digital analytics platform, in order to track traffic on our commercial site while preserving total control of the data and fully respect the privacy of our users."
TRY IT FOR FREE
Matomo adheres to GDPR, HIPAA, CCPA, LGPD and PECR
Data Protection Authorities across the EU are ruling Google Analytics illegal to use under the GDPR. Starting with the
Austrian Data Protection Authority’s ruling
on Google Analytics and then the
CNIL
followed suit with a similar ruling. Finding a GDPR compliant Google Analytics alternative is more important than ever.
Matomo can be configured to automatically anonymise data so you don’t process any personal information.
Make sure you’re not processing any PII (Personally Identifiable Information) with Matomo
. This allows you to be
GDPR
,
HIPAA
,
CCPA
, LGPD and
PECR compliant, and helps minimise risk of fines.
Importance of data privacy
As we all know privacy is a major concern for anyone who spends a lot of time online. Websites can use tracking tools to collect
personally identifiable information (PII)
in incorrect ways, which can threaten privacy.
Here are a few examples of how websites can gather your personal information even once you’ve left their site:
Google
Companies like Google can be a threat to privacy due to the information they gather and what they end up doing with it. Even though they’re providing a free service, there are more privacy sacrifices as your analytics data is tracked, stored and owned by them. This means they have access to data like internet activity logs (websites, pages visited, searches), which reveal a lot of personal info about our life, and work.
When using Google Analytics, Google knows all the IP addresses (and other browser unique identifiers which can be considered personal data) of visitors to your site. Through this they can then track the six other websites that person visited earlier that day, and the 50 websites she/he looked at in the last month. By re-using such visits log data tracked on your website they can enrich existing profiles for given IP addresses.
Google Analytics dominates the industry with a
market share of 84%
. Coupled with their other products that use tracking beacons, such as Adsense, you can see their immense ability to build an accurate picture of most visitors to websites.
Why is this profiling for marketing purposes considered a “problem” for privacy?
Platforms like Google are able to build an enormous profile of all websites and pages looked at by most internet users worldwide (even if they’re not Google users).
One of their main goals is to improve the re-marketing of Google Ads to internet users – to sell to people better. But many internet users and website operators are growing concerned about what could be termed a Global Internet User Activity Database and its moral implications. You don’t need to be a Privacy Junkie to be interested in the challenges and moral implications of gathering so much data on the internet.
We choose not to discuss the details here but recommend you check out the
Privacy section of the EFF website
to learn more. You may also be interested in the article
“The High Privacy Cost of a “Free” Website”
(themarkup.org) for a
more
recent in-depth analysis.
Why choose Matomo for privacy?
The Centre for Data Privacy Protection in France (CNIL) lists Matomo as a tool
that can easily ensure full compliance
of privacy regulations.
The CNIL also has approved Matomo as one of a select few web analytics tools that is
exempt from tracking consent
requirements.
Matomo’s strong privacy leadership is reflected by the many government agencies who already trust and rely on Matomo (in Europe, Asia, North America, Africa).
Government agencies that choose Matomo
Germany’s Press and Information Office of the Federal Government
The New Zealand government
The European Commission for
Europa Analytics
A bonus: consent free tracking
Matomo supports consent free tracking
. So you don’t always need to ask your visitors for cookie consent or for tracking consent. This way you not only get more accurate data but also don’t annoy your visitors with cookie consent banners that might damage your brand and results in lost customers and data. This is different to Google Analytics where you always have to ask for consent.
You've earned the Matomo Privacy Badge!
Grab this badge of honour and showcase it proudly on your site to show that you, too, respect user privacy with Matomo.
Our Privacy Policy
If you want to get a deeper understanding of Matomo’s commitment to privacy, have a read of our
Privacy Policy
.
TRY IT FOR FREE
Sub-policy 1
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Notice
You must log in to continue.
Log Into Facebook
You must log in to continue.
Log In
Forgot account?
·
Sign up for Facebook
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 2
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en&gl=de:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 3
https://twitter.com/en/privacy:
Skip to main content
Privacy Policy
Privacy Settings
Privacy Center
Help Center
Policy Archive
Download PDF
X Privacy Policy
Effective: November 15, 2024
Before you scroll, read this
It’s really hard to make everyone happy with a Privacy Policy. Most people who use X want something short and easy to understand. While we wish we could fit everything you need to know into a post, our regulators ask us to meet our legal obligations by describing them all in a lot of detail.
With that in mind, we’ve written our Privacy Policy as simply as possible to empower you to make informed decisions when you use X by making sure you understand and have control over the information we collect, how it’s used, and when it’s shared.
So if you skip reading every word of the Privacy Policy, at least know this:
X is a public platform
Learn what’s viewable & searchable
We collect some data
about you
Learn what we collect & how
Affiliate services may have their own policies
Learn about affiliates
We use your data to make X better
Learn how we make your info work
You can control your experience
Learn how to update your settings
If you have questions about how we use data, just ask
Learn how to contact us
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
Privacy Policy
1. Information We Collect
2. How We Use Information
3. Sharing Information
4. How Long We Keep Information
5. Take Control
6. Your Rights and Ours
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
9. General
10. How To Contact X
1. Information We Collect
The information we collect when you use X falls into three categories.
1.1 Information you provide us.
To use some of our products and services you need to have an account, and to create an account, you need to provide us certain information. Likewise, if you use our paid products and services, we cannot provide them to you without getting payment information. Basically, certain information is necessary if you want to use many of our products and services.
Personal Accounts.
If you create an account, you must provide us with some information so that we can provide our services to you. This includes a display name (for example, “Creators”); a username (for example, @XCreators); a password; an email address or phone number; a date of birth; your display language; and third-party single sign-in information (if you choose this sign-in method). You can also choose to share your location in your profile and posts, and to upload your address book to X to help find people you may know. Your profile information, which includes your display name and username, is always public, but you can use either your real name or a pseudonym. And remember, you can create multiple X accounts, for example, to express different parts of your identity, professional or otherwise.
Professional Accounts.
If you create a
professional account
, you also need to provide us with a professional category, and may provide us with other information, including street address, contact email address, and contact phone number, all of which will always be public.
Payment Information.
In order to purchase ads or other offerings provided as part of our paid products and services you will need to provide us payment information, including your credit or debit card number, card expiration date, CVV code, and billing address.
Preferences.
When you set your preferences using your
settings
, we collect that information so that we can respect your preferences.
Biometric Information.
Based on your consent, we may collect and use your biometric information for safety, security, and identification purposes.
Job Applications / Recommendations.
We may collect and use your personal information (such as your biographical information, employment history, educational history, employment preferences, skills and abilities, and job search activity and engagement, in addition to the information we already collect as disclosed in the “Information we collect when you use X” section of our Privacy Policy below) to recommend potential jobs to you, to share with potential employers when you apply for a job, to enable connections for professional opportunities, and to show you more relevant advertising.
1.2 Information we collect when you use X.
When you use our services, we collect information about how you use our products and services. We use that information to provide you with products and services, to help keep X more secure and respectful for everyone, and more relevant to you.
Usage Information.
We collect information about your activity on X, including:
Posts and other content you post (including the date, application, and version of X) and information about your broadcast activity (e.g., Spaces), including broadcasts you’ve created and when you created them, your lists, bookmarks, and Communities you are a part of.
Your interactions with other users’ content, such as reposts, likes, bookmarks, shares, downloads, replies, if other users mention or tag you in content or if you mention or tag them, and broadcasts you’ve participated in (including your viewing history, listening, commenting, speaking, and reacting).
How you interact with others on the platform, such as people you follow and people who follow you, metadata related to
Encrypted Messages
, and when you use
Direct Messages
, including the contents of the messages, the recipients, and date and time of messages.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will collect information about the communication and its content.
We collect information on links you interact with across our services (including in our emails sent to you).
Purchase and payments.
To allow you to make a payment or send money using X features or services, including through an intermediary, we may receive information about your transaction such as when it was made, when a subscription is set to expire or auto-renew, and amounts paid or received.
Device Information.
We collect information from and about the devices you use to access X, including:
Information about your connection, such as your IP address, browser type, and related information.
Information about your device and its settings, such as device and advertising ID, operating system, carrier, language, memory, apps installed, and battery level.
Your device address book, if you’ve chosen to share it with us.
Location Information.
When you use X, we collect some information about your approximate location to provide the service you expect, including showing you relevant ads. You can also choose to share your current precise location or places where you’ve previously used X by enabling these settings in your account.
Inferred Identity.
We may collect or receive information that we use to infer your identity as detailed below:
When you sign into X on a browser or device, we will associate that browser or device with your account. Subject to your settings, we may also associate your account with browsers or devices other than those you use to sign into X (or associate your signed-out device or browser with other browsers or devices or X-generated identiﬁers).
When you provide other information to X, including an email address or phone number, we associate that information with your X account. Subject to your settings, we may also use this information in order to infer other information about your identity, for example by associating your account with hashes of email addresses that share common components with the email address you have provided to X.
When you access X and are not signed in, we may infer your identity based on the information we collect.
Log Information.
We may receive information when you view content on or otherwise interact with our products and services, even if you have not created an account or are signed out, such as:
IP address and related information; browser type and language; operating system; the referring webpage; access times; pages visited; location; your mobile carrier; device information (including device and application IDs); search terms and IDs (including those not submitted as queries); ads shown to you on X; X-generated identiﬁers; and identiﬁers associated with cookies. We also receive log information when you click on, view, or interact with links on our services, including when you install another application through X.
Advertisements.
When you view or interact with ads we serve on or oﬀ X, we may collect information about those views or interactions (e.g., watching a video ad or preroll, clicking on an ad, interacting with reposts of or replies to an ad).
Cookies and similar technologies.
Like many websites, we use cookies and similar technologies to collect additional website usage data and to operate our services. Cookies are not required for many parts of our products and services such as searching and looking at public proﬁles. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
Interactions with our content on third-party sites.
When you view our content on third-party websites that integrate X content, such as embedded timelines or post buttons, we may receive log information that includes the web page you visited.
1.3 Information we receive from third parties.
When you use other online products and services, they may share information about that usage with us.
Ad Partners, Developers, Publishers.
Our ad and business partners share information with us such as browser cookie IDs, X-generated identifiers,
mobile device IDs, hashed user information like email addresses, demographic or interest data, and content viewed or actions taken on a website or app. Some of our ad partners, particularly our advertisers, also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives,
generates, or infers
about you described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy.
Other Third Parties, Account Connections, and Integrations.
We may receive information about you from third parties who are not our ad partners, such as other X users, developers, and partners who help us evaluate the safety and quality of content on our platform, our
corporate affiliates
, and other services you link to your X account. You may choose to connect your X account to your account on another service, and that other service may send us information about your account on that service.
2. How We Use Information
Breaking down how we use the information we collect is not simple because of the way the systems that bring our services to you work. For example, the same piece of information may be used differently for different purposes to ultimately deliver a single service. We think it’s most useful to describe the five main ways we use information and if you have questions that are not answered, you can always
contact us
. Here we go:
2.1 Operate, improve, and personalize our services.
We use the information we collect to provide and operate X products and services. We also use the information we collect to improve and personalize our products and services so that you have a better experience on X, including by showing you more relevant content and ads, suggesting people and topics to follow, enabling and helping you discover
affiliates
, third-party apps, and services. We may use the information we collect and publicly available information to help train our machine learning or artificial intelligence models for the purposes outlined in this policy.
We may use the information we collect from accounts of other services that you choose to connect to your X account to provide you features like cross-posting or cross-service authentication, and to operate our services.
We use your contact information to help others find your account if your settings permit, including through third-party services and client applications.
We use your information to provide our advertising and sponsored content services subject to your
settings
, which helps make ads on X more relevant to you. We also use this information to measure the effectiveness of ads and to help recognize your devices to serve you ads on and off of X. Some of our ad partners also enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our advertising technology. Information shared by ad partners and affiliates or collected by X from the websites and apps of ad partners and affiliates may be combined with the other information you share with X and that X receives, generates, or infers about you, as described elsewhere in our Privacy Policy.
2.2  Foster safety and security.
We use information we collect to provide for the safety and security of our users, our products, services, and your account. This includes verifying your identity, authenticating your account, and defending against fraud, unauthorized use, and illegal activity. We also use the information to evaluate and affect the safety and quality of content on X - this includes investigating and enforcing our policies and and terms, as well as applicable law.
2.3 Measure, analyze and make our services better.
We use the information we collect to measure and analyze the effectiveness of our products and services and to better understand how you use them in order to make them better.
2.4 Communicate with you about our services.
We use the information we collect to communicate with you about our products and services, including about product updates and changes to our policies and terms. If you’re open to hearing from us, we may also send you marketing messages from time to time.
2.5 Research.
We use information you share with us, or that we collect to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
3. Sharing Information
You should know the ways we share your information, why we share it, and how you can control it. There are five general ways we share your information.
3.1 When you post and share.
With the general public
. You are directing us to disclose that information as broadly as possible. X content, including your profile information (e.g., name/pseudonym, username, profile pictures), is available for viewing by the general public. The public does not need to be signed in to view some content on X. They may also find X content off of X: for example, from search query results on Internet search engines or videos downloaded and reshared elsewhere (depending on your
settings
).
With other X users.
Depending on your
settings
, and based on the X products and services you use, we share:
Your interactions with X content of other users, such as replies, and people you follow.
Content you send to a specific X user, such as through
Direct Messages
. Please keep in mind that if you’ve shared information like Direct Messages or protected posts with someone else who accesses X through a third-party service, the information may be shared with the third-party service.
With partners.
Depending on your
settings
, we also provide certain third parties with information to help us offer or operate our products and services. You can learn more about these partnerships in our
Help Center
. You can control whether X shares your personal information with these partners by using the “Data sharing with business partners” option in your
Privacy & Safety settings
. (This setting does not control sharing described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, such as when we share information with our service providers, or through partnerships other than as described in this
Help Center
article.)
3.2 With third parties & third-party integrations.
With service providers.
We may share your information with our
service providers
that perform functions and provide services on our behalf, including payment services providers who facilitate payments; service providers that host our various blogs and wikis; service providers that help us understand the use of our services; applicant tracking system providers to send and receive applicant and job data to potential employers; and those that provide fraud detection services.
With advertisers.
Advertising revenue enables us to provide our products and services. Advertisers may learn information from your engagement with their ads on or off X. For example, if you click on an external link or ad on our services, that advertiser or website operator might figure out that you came from X, along with other information associated with the ad you clicked, such as characteristics of the audience it was intended to reach and other X-generated identifiers for that ad. They may also collect other personal information from you, such as cookie identifiers, or your IP address.
Third-party content & integrations.
We share or disclose your information with your consent or at your direction, such as when you
authorize a third-party web client or application
to access your account or when you direct us to share your feedback with a business. Similarly, to improve your experience, we work with third-party partners to display their video content on X or to allow cross-platform sharing. When you watch or otherwise interact with content from our video or cross-platform sharing partners, they may receive and process your personal information as described in their privacy policies. For video content, you can adjust your
autoplay settings
if you prefer that content not to play automatically.
Third-party collaborators.
Depending on your
settings
, or if you decide to share your data, we may share or disclose your information with third parties. If you do not opt out, in some instances the recipients of the information may use it for their own independent purposes in addition to those stated in X’s Privacy Policy, including, for example, to train their artificial intelligence models, whether generative or otherwise.
Through our APIs.
We use technology like
APIs
and embeds to make public X information available to websites, apps, and others for their use, for example, displaying posts on a news website or analyzing what people say on X. We generally make this content available in limited quantities for free and charge licensing fees for large-scale access. We have
standard terms
that govern how this information can be used, and a compliance program to enforce these terms. But these individuals and companies are not affiliated with X, and their offerings may not reflect updates you make on X. For more information about how we make public data on X available to the world, visit
https://developer.x.com
.
3.3 When required by law, to prevent harm, or in the public interest.
We may preserve, use, share, or disclose your information if we believe that it is reasonably necessary to:
comply with a law, regulation,
legal process, or governmental request
;
protect the safety of any person, protect the safety or integrity of our platform, including to help prevent spam, abuse, or malicious actors on our services;
explain why we have removed content or accounts from our services (e.g., for a violation of
our Rules
);
address fraud, security, or technical issues; or
protect our rights or property, or the rights or property of those who use our services.
We may also use different signals and your data to infer, preserve, use, share, or disclose your age and identity information in order to comply with regulatory requirements as well as for safety, security, fraud, know-your-customer, know-your-business, and identity verification, as the case may be. We may also share or disclose your age and identity information with our partners, service providers, and others for these purposes.
3.4 With our Affiliates.
We may share information amongst our
affiliates
to provide our products and services.
3.5 As a result of a change in ownership.
We may share, sell, or transfer information about you in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, sale of assets, or bankruptcy. This Privacy Policy will apply to your personal information that is shared with (before and after the close of any transaction) or transferred to the new entity.
4. How Long We Keep Information
We keep different types of information for different periods of time, depending on how long we need to retain it in order to provide you with our products and services, to comply with our legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
We keep your profile information, such as your display name, user name, password and email address for the duration of your account. We cannot provide you with our products and services without retaining this information.
We keep your usage information, such as the content you post, your interactions with other users’ content and how you interact with others on the platform for the duration of your account or until such content is removed.
We keep your payment information, including your credit or debit card number and billing address for the duration you use our paid products and services. Records of transactions will be kept for longer, in accordance with applicable law.
If you communicate with us, such as through email, we will keep information about the communication and its content for up to 18 months, unless it is necessary for us to retain it for a longer period to comply with our legal obligations or to exercise or defend our legal rights.
We generally collect device information, location information, inferred identity information and log information using cookies. We keep cookies and information collected using cookies for up to 13 months. You can learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies
here
.
We keep information about your views or interactions with ads on or off X, as well as how you interact with our content on third-party sites for up to 90 days.
We keep information shared by ad and business partners for up to 90 days.
Where you violate our Rules and your account is suspended, we may keep the identifiers you used to create the account (such as your email address or phone number) indefinitely to prevent repeat policy offenders from creating new accounts.
We may need to keep certain information longer than our policies specify in order to comply with legal requirements and for safety and security reasons. For example:
To comply with a law, regulation, legal process or governmental request.
Including in order to adhere to a legally appropriate preservation request made by law enforcement. You can read more about law enforcement access
here
.
In connection with legal claims, litigation and regulatory matters.
Including where it is reasonably necessary to retain information relating to your account in order to defend X against legal claims.
To maintain the safety and security of our products and services.
Including where it is necessary to store your information longer in order to investigate and fight abuse on our products and services.
Remember public content can exist elsewhere even after it is removed from X. For example, search engines and other third parties may retain copies of your posts longer, based upon their own privacy policies, even after they are deleted or expire on X. You can read more about search visibility
here
.
5. Take Control
5.1 Access, Correction, Portability.
You can access, correct, or modify the information you provided to us by editing your profile and adjusting your account
settings
.
You can learn more about the information we have collected or inferred about you in
Your X Data
and request access to additional information
here
.
You can download a copy of your information, such as your posts, by following the instructions
here
.
To protect your privacy and maintain security, we take steps to verify your identity before granting you access to your personal information or complying with a deletion, portability, or other related request. We may, in certain situations, reject your request for access, correction, or portability, for example, we may reject access where you are unable to verify your identity.
5.2 Deleting your Information.
If you follow the instructions
here
, your account will be deactivated and your data will be queued for deletion. When deactivated, your X account, including your display name, username, and public profile, will no longer be viewable on X.com, X for iOS, and X for Android. For up to 30 days after deactivation it is still possible to restore your X account if it was accidentally or wrongfully deactivated.
5.3 Objecting to, Restricting, or Withdrawing your Consent.
You can manage your privacy settings and other account features
here
. If you change your settings it may take some time for your choices to be fully reflected throughout our systems. You may also notice changes in your X experience or limitations in your ability to access certain features depending on the settings you’ve adjusted. You may also manage additional settings when interacting with certain content and features on different parts of the platform, such as whether a
Space
is recorded, or whether
videos you upload
are downloadable by others.
5.4 Authorized Agent Requests.
To submit a request related to access, modification, or deletion of your information, or someone else’s information if you are their authorized agent, you may also contact us as specified in the How To Contact X section of our Privacy Policy below. We may require you to provide additional information for verification.
6. Your Rights and Ours
We provide X to people all over the world and provide many of the same privacy tools and controls to all of our users regardless of where they live. However, your experience may be slightly different than users in other countries to ensure X respects local requirements.
6.1 We have specific legal bases to use your information.
X has carefully considered the legal reasons it is permitted to collect, use, share and otherwise process your information. If you want to dig in to learn more and better understand the nuances, we’d encourage you to check out
this additional information about data processing
. And no, we don’t sell your personal information.
6.2 We move your data to make X work for you.
Just as you use X to seamlessly participate in global conversations with people in countries all over the world, X must move information across borders and to different countries around the world to support the safe and reliable service you depend on. For example, if you live in Europe and are having a conversation with someone in the United States, information has to move between those countries to provide that experience – it’s what you expect from us.
We also use data centers and cloud providers, and engage
our affiliates
and third-party partners and
service providers
located in many parts of the world to help us provide our services. Before we move data between countries we look at the risks that may be presented to the data and rely on
standard contractual clauses
(SCCs), where applicable, to ensure your data rights are protected. To request a copy of the SCCs, please contact us
here
. If data will be shared with a third party, we require them to maintain the same protections over your data that we provide directly.
X is a
participant
in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF. X complies with the DPF Principles for all its processing of personal data received from the European Union, Switzerland and the UK, in reliance on the EU-US DPF, Swiss-US DPF and UK Extension to the EU-US DPF, respectively. If you have an inquiry or complaint related to our participation in the DPF, please contact us
here
. As part of our participation in the DPF, if you have a dispute with us about our adherence to the DPF Principles, we will seek to resolve it through our internal complaint resolution process, alternatively through the US-based independent dispute resolution body
JAMS
, and under certain conditions, through the DPF Arbitration Process following the procedures and subject to the conditions described in
Annex 1
to the DPF Principles. DPF participants are subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the US Federal Trade Commission and other authorized statutory bodies. Under certain circumstances, participants may be liable for the transfer of personal data from the EU, Switzerland and the UK to third parties outside the EU, Switzerland and the UK. Learn more about the EU-US DPF, the Swiss-US DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-US DPF
here
.
7. X's Audience
8. Changes To This Privacy Policy
The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs our processing of your personal data and we may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time as needed.
If we do revise this Privacy Policy and make changes that are determined by us to be material, we will provide you notice and an opportunity to review the revised Privacy Policy before you continue to use X.
9. General
The X Privacy Policy is written in English but is made available in multiple languages through translations. X strives to make the translations as accurate as possible to the original English version. However, in case of any discrepancies or inconsistencies, the English language version of the X Privacy Policy shall take precedence. You acknowledge that English shall be the language of reference for interpreting and constructing the terms of the X Privacy Policy.
10. How To Contact X
We want to hear from you if you have thoughts or questions about this Privacy Policy. You can contact us via our
Privacy Policy Inquiries
page or by writing to us at the appropriate address below.
Information about our handling of California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) requests is available
here
. Information about our handling of “Consumer Health Data” and associated requests as defined under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act and other similar state laws is available
here
.
If you live in the United States or any other country outside of the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is X Corp., with an address of:
X Corp.
Attn: Privacy Policy Inquiry
865 FM 1209, Building 2
Bastrop, TX 78602
If you live in the European Union, EFTA States, or the United Kingdom, the data controller responsible for your personal data is Twitter International Unlimited Company, with an address of:
Twitter International Unlimited Company
Attn: Data Protection Officer
One Cumberland Place, Fenian Street
Dublin 2, D02 AX07 IRELAND
If you live in Switzerland, you can also contact our appointed representative at the following address:
Twitter Switzerland GmbH
Attn: Data Protection Officer
c/o Wasag Treuhand AG
Bolligenstrasse 18
Bern, 3006, SWITZERLAND
If you wish to raise a concern about our
data processing practices
, you have the right to do so with your local supervisory authority or Twitter International Unlimited Company’s lead supervisory authority, the Irish Data Protection Commission, using the
contact details
listed on their website.
View previous policies
Take control of your privacy
Adjust your settings
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://vimeo.com/privacy:
Solutions
Video marketing
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Event marketing
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Employee communication
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Video monetization
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Create
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Manage
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Grow
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
DEMO VIDEOS
Get to know everything Vimeo can do for your business.
Watch now
Resources
Learn
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Connect
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Best of the Year
Browse Videos
Staff Picks
Categories
Channels
On Demand
Pricing
Contact Sales
Log in
Join
Help
Pricing
Log in
Join
Settings
Language
Mature content filter
Watch
More
Vimeo OTT
On Demand
Stock
Vimeo Experts
For Hire
Referrals
Legal
Terms
Privacy
U.S. State Privacy
Copyright
Cookies
Log in
Join
Login
Solutions
Power your marketing strategy with perfectly branded videos to drive better ROI.
Host virtual events and webinars to increase engagement and generate leads.
Inspire employees with compelling live and on-demand video experiences.
Build a site and generate income from purchases, subscriptions, and courses.
Features
Interactive video
Live stream
Screen recorder
Create video maker
Online video editor
Hire a video pro
Video library
Ad-free player
Video hosting
Privacy
Small business
Enterprise
Webinars
Video analytics
Video monetization
Resources
Vimeo blog
Video School
Customer stories
Investor Relations
Developer tools
Partner program
Creative community
Help center
Watch
Pricing
Contact Sales
Search
Search
Upload
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Copyright
Cookies
Desktop site
Language
English
Español
Deutsch
Français
日本語
Português
한국어
FAQ
Help
TM + © 2025 Vimeo.com, Inc.
Sub-policy 5
https://fundraiseup.com/privacy/:
Privacy policy
Your privacy rights
Effective Date: July 23, 2024
This Privacy Policy describes the types of information gathered by Fundraise Up Inc. (“Fundraise Up”, “us” or “we”) in the process of providing this website (
https://fundraiseup.com/
) (the “Site”), the cloud-based platform (the “Software”) and the data, services, information, tools, functionality, updates and similar materials (collectively, the “Service”), how we use it, with whom the information may be shared, what choices are available to you regarding collection, use and distribution of information and our efforts to protect the information you provide to us through the Service.
By using the Service, you hereby consent to allow us to process information in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Please also refer to our Terms of Service, available here
https://fundraiseup.com/terms
, which are hereby incorporated as if fully recited herein. Any defined terms found, but not defined herein, shall have the same definition as in the Terms of Service.
Territoriality
Regardless of where our servers are located, your personal data may be processed by us in the United States, where data protection and privacy regulations may or may not be to the same level of protection as in other parts of the world. BY VISITING THE SITE AND USING THE SERVICE, YOU UNEQUIVOCALLY AND UNAMBIGUOUSLY CONSENT TO THE COLLECTION AND PROCESSING IN THE UNITED STATES OF ANY INFORMATION COLLECTED OR OBTAINED BY US THROUGH VOLUNTARY SUBMISSIONS, AND, TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THAT U.S. LAW GOVERNS ANY SUCH COLLECTION AND PROCESSING.
This Privacy Policy is subject to the provisions of the General Data Protection Regulation ("GDPR"), the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended, (“CCPA”), the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth), as amended (“APA”) and other applicable privacy laws. Fundraise Up agrees that under the GDPR, it is a data “processor”, the non-profits we work with are data “controllers”, and you, if you are an individual and reside in the United Kingdom, the European Economic Area, or Switzerland (collectively, and for the purposes of this Privacy Policy, the “EEA”), are a “Data Subject” with certain protected privacy rights concerning your “Personal Data.” In the event that you are a Data Subject and using our Site, an employee or agent of one of the non-profits that we work with, applying for a job with us, we are a “controller” with respect to your personal data, or if we are using your personal data for an internal purpose. Similarly, under the CCPA, we are a “Service Provider”, the non-profits are “Businesses”, and you, if you are an individual residing in California, are a “Consumer” with certain protected privacy rights concerning your “Personal Information”. However, in the event that you are a Consumer and using our Site, an employee or agent of one of the non-profits that we work with, applying for a job with us, or if we are using your personal data for an internal purpose, we are a “Business” with respect to your Personal Information. We will take commercially reasonable steps to maintain compliance with GDPR and CCPA requirements. Your Personal Data and Personal Information may identify you as a person, and thus may be referred to as Personally Identifiable Information ("PII").
1. Who Collects Your Information On Our Service?
We do. Under the CCPA we are a “Business” and pursuant to the GDPR, Fundraise Up is what is known as the “processor” of the PII that you provide to us. We collect information from you on the Service, and we are responsible for protection of your information.
2. Where did we get your data from?
Browser
Your internet browser (such as Mozilla Firefox, Google Chrome, etc.) automatically transmits some information to us every time you access content on one of our internet domains. Examples of such information include the URL of the particular Web page you visited, the IP (Internet Protocol) address of the computer you are using, or the browser version that you are using to access the website.
Directly from you
We may obtain PII directly from you, e.g. when you contact us.
Third parties
We may also obtain your PII from organizations, when our cookies are enabled on the non-profit clients’ (“organizations”) websites, and other third parties.
3. What data, for what purposes, on what basis, and for how long do we process?
We will only collect personal data about you and your donors insofar as is necessary to achieve the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
Processing operations at our website
fundraiseup.com
Purpose of Data Processing
Legal Basis
Data Categories
Retention Period
To monitor user activity at our website to improve its performance
Consent
Session data (which includes Session ID, Session start date and time, Session total time, Session start source, Session start URL, Session start referrer, Custom event type, Event ID, Event date and time, Page View ID, URL Page referrer, Page title, Languages UTM source Clicks on links),Client ID, Client Locale, Time zone, IP address, Country code Region, City, Latitude and longitude, Connection type, Status (online/offline), Device data (which includes Device pixel ratio, Device memory, Hardware Concurrency, Connection Downlink, Connection RTT Device type,Battery Charging, Battery Level, Device model, Operating system, Resolution width and height) User Agent
Until you withdraw your consent
To monitor user activity at our website to ensure its security (necessary cookies)
Legitimate interest to ensure security and proper functionality of our website
Session
To apply to careers section
Legitimate interest
First name, Last name, Email, Phone, Education, Work experience
Up to 3 years
To contact our sales team
Contract
Email, First name, Last name, Organization name, Organization location, Job title, Phone number
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
To answer incoming technical support questions
Contract
Email, Data from messages, Organization name
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
Processing operations in an organization’s dashboard
Purpose of Data Processing
Legal Basis
Data Categories
Retention Period
To create/terminate account in dashboard
Contract
Email, Organization name, Invitation link, First name, Last name, Password, Access rights, Organization website, Country, Default locale, Currency, Standard currency fee, Partners
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
To log in dashboard account
We are a processor
Email, Password
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
To manage services in a personal account in the dashboard (general)
We are a processor
Email, First name, Last name, Organization name, Service start date, Accounts, Campaigns, Payment methods, Account ID, Campaign ID, Password, Two-Factor Authentication (whether enabled or not)
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
To show dynamic reporting, allowing to see key findings calculated from some or all of donations and recurring plans
We are a processor
Email, First name, Last name, Email, Organization name, Service start date, Amount of donations raised, Type of donations (e.g., recurring), Campaigns, Designations, Source of donations, Percentage of supporters that used suggested amount of donation, Percentage of donations that were upsold to core transaction costs, Percentage of donations made from mobile devices, Percentage of donations made from desktop, Payment methods
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
To keep track of donations
We are a processor
Date of donation, Accounts, Donation amount, Payment methods, Donation ID, Donation status, Organization name, Supporter name Email, First name, Last name, Receipt, Receipt number, Campaigns, Designations, Type of donations (e.g., recurring), Fees, Payment ID, Payment processor, Credit card credentials (last 4 signs and effective date), Supporter email, Mailing lists the supporter is subscribed to, Comments, Source of donation (website, page, element), Supporter IP address, Supporter geolocation (country and city), Browser, Device, Operating system, Suggested cover fees, Suggested frequency used, UTM parameters, Emails sent to the supporter, Tributes
Term of Agreement or Terms of Service
Our actions at organizations’ websites and checkout pages
Purpose of Data Processing
Legal Basis
Data Categories
Retention Period
To detect fraudulent activities
Legitimate interest to ensure security of our services
IP address, Donation amount, Organization name, Payment methods
Up to 3 years
To monitor user interaction with donation element (checkout) at organizations’ websites to prevent fraudulent activity
Legitimate interest to ensure security of our services
Details of the last incomplete payment via our Checkout User interaction with our Checkout Session page (the order number of the currently viewed page), User ID, Session data, Session token, Client ID, Client start date and time, Client Locale, Time zone, IP address, Country code, Region, Connection type, Number of requests from this IP at landing and dashboard Status (online/offline), Device data, User Agent Languages, Checkout type, type of donation (e.g., recurring), Elements in the checkout clicked, Errors, Checkout frequency, Currency, Donation amount, Currency rate, Campaign key, Donation status, Fee covered, Payment methods, Card last 4 digits
Up to 3 years
To monitor user interaction with donation element (checkout) at organizations’ websites to optimize user experience
Consent
The same data categories as are mentioned above
Until you withdraw your consent
To process donations
We are a processor
Date of donation, donation amount, Payment methods, Donation ID, Supporter name,receipt number, Type of donations (e.g., recurring), Payment ID, Payment processor, Credit card credentials (last 4 signs and effective date), Percentage of supporters that used suggested amount of donation, Mailing lists the supporter is subscribed to, Comments, Source of donation (website, page, element), Supporter IP address, Supporter geolocation (country and city), Browser, Device, Operating System, Suggested cover fees, Suggested amounts used, Suggested frequency used, UTM parameters, Supporter’s employer (if requested by an organization), Phone number (if requested by an organization), Accept of Terms of Use, Date of first donation, Date of last donation, Designations
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To process donation made via crypto
We are a processor
Organization name, Supporter IP address, Supporter’s employer (if requested by an organization), Mailing lists the supporter is subscribed to, Supporter name, Supporter email, Supporter geolocation (country and city)
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To make donation via virtual terminal
We are a processor
Campaigns, Type of donations (e.g., recurring), Donation amount Date of donation, Transaction costs, Supporter name, Supporter email, Receipt number, Credit card effective date, Payment methods, PDF Receipt (if enabled)
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To remind of an incomplete donation through a pop-up
We are a processor
Details of the last incomplete payment via our Checkout User ID
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To make hints of the amounts in the checkout
We are a processor
User Agent Session total time Device
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To suggest further donations (post-donation upsell)
We are a processor
Donation amount, Supporter IP address, User interaction with our Checkout, User ID, Donation status, Type of donations (e.g., recurring)
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To become a recurring supporter
We are a processor
Supporter name, Donation amount, Total amount of donations made by a particular supporter, Date of next donation Installments
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To double the donation according to donor’s employment policy
We are a processor
Donation amount, Supporter IP address, User interaction with our Checkout, User ID, Donation status, Type of donations (e.g., recurring), Supporter’s employment
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To determine if an email is valid
Legitimate interest to ensure that email is delivered
Email
Up to 3 years
To determine whether the address of a donor is valid
Legitimate interest to ensure that data are correct
Address
Up to 3 years
To thank supporters via email for donations made and scheduled as well as for becoming a recurring supporter
We are a processor
Date of email, Supporter email, Data from messages
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To notify supporters about failed donations via email
We are a processor
Date of email, Supporter email, Data from messages
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To notify supporters about successful donations via email
We are a processor
Date of email, Supporter email, Data from messages PDF Receipt (if enabled)
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To notify fundraisers about start of the campaign
We are a processor
Fundraiser’s link, Supporter email, Campaigns, Organization name
Determined by the controller (organizations)
Our processing operations at donor’s portal
Purpose of Data Processing
Legal Basis
Data Categories
Retention Period
To manage donations in personal donor’s portal
We are a processor
Supporter name, Donation amount, User ID, Supporter email, Payment processor, Payment ID, Receipt, Donation ID, Date of donation, donation status, Languages, Location, Donations history, Donation dedication type, Donation tribute name, Donation tribute name, Customized card settings
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To log in donor’s portal
We are a processor
Email, Password, Invitation link
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To improve our service by tracking actions at donor’s portal
Consent
Session data, Client ID, Country code, Region, City, Latitude and longitude, Connection type, Status (online/offline), Device data, User Agent Languages
To become a Fundraiser
We are a processor
Last name, First name, Organization name, Fundraiser’s link, Checkout text, Checkout photo, Campaign goal, Number of page views, Number of donations, User ID, Campaign ID, Designations, Goal date, Members
Determined by the controller (organizations)
To notify member of Fundraisers
We are a processor
Last name, First name, Email, Role, Fundraiser’s link, Invitation link, Checkout photo, Amount of donations raised, Goal date, Campaign goal
Determined by the controller (organizations)
Relations with organizations’ representatives
Purpose of Data Processing
Legal Basis
Data Categories
Retention Period
To contact people who have left an application on the website
Contract
Email, First name, Last name, Organization name, Organization location, Job title, Phone number, Call recording
Up to 3 years
To fill in client’s data in CRM system to maintain relations with them
Legitimate interest to maintain relations with our clients
Email, First name, Last name, Organization name, Organization location, Job title, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To search for potential clients on LinkedIn
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
LinkedIn Profile, Organization, Job title, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To conduct account-based marketing according profiles’ titles via LinkedIn
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
Job title
Up to 3 years
To contact potential clients via LinkedIn
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
LinkedIn Profile, Organization, Job title, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To find contact details of NGO staff
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
Organization, Job title, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To contact potential clients via email
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
Organization, Job title, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To inform potential clients about services in which they may be interested
Legitimate interest to offer our services to those who might be interested
Organization, Job title, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To sign contracts with our customers
Contract
First name, Last name, Organization name, Job title, Organization tax ID, Email, Phone number
Up to 3 years
To communicate with the client during the project
Contract
First name, Last name, Organization name, Job title, Email, Phone number, Data from messages
Up to 3 years
To receive a commission on donations provided to the organization
Contract
Organization, Payment methods, Donation amount
Up to 3 years
To register participants of offline conferences and webinars
Contract
First name, Last name, Organization name, Job title, Email, Phone number, Data from messages
Up to 3 years
To conduct webinars
Contract
Zoom profile
Up to 3 years
To inform about our upcoming conferences and webinars via email newsletter
Legitimate interest to keep our customers updated
Organization, Last name, First name, Email
Up to 3 years
To send news and updates of our services
Consent
Organization, Last name, First name, Email
Up to 3 years
Personal data that we process to enter into a contract are necessary to provide you with our services. If you choose not to provide Fundraise Up with your data, following obstacles may occur:
When the data is processed to contact our sales team, we may be unable to provide you with information about our products or services;
When the data is processed to answer incoming technical support questions, we may not be able to effectively address your technical support inquiries, which could lead to delays in resolving issues or providing assistance;
When the data is processed to create/terminate your account in dashboard, failure to provide the necessary personal information may prevent you from accessing or managing your account on our platform, limiting your ability to utilize its features and services;
When the data is processed to contact people who have left an application on the website, we may be unable to follow up on your application or inquiry, potentially resulting in missed communication regarding your request or interest;
When the data is processed to sign contracts with our customers, non-provision of personal data may hinder our ability to complete the contract formation process;
When the data is processed to communicate with the client during the project, lack of personal data may impede effective communication during the project, potentially leading to misunderstandings, delays, or difficulties in achieving project goals;
When the data is processed to receive a commission on donations provided to the organization, we may be unable to properly attribute and process commissions related to donations;
When the data is processed to register participants of offline conferences and webinars, failure to provide personal data may prevent your registration for events; and
When the data is processed to conduct webinars, we may be unable to effectively manage participant access and communication.
4. Co-branded Site(s)
We may partner with other companies to provide you with content or Services on a joint or “co-branded” basis. At a co-branded site, you will see both our logo and the logo of the co-branding partner displayed on your screen. In the instance of a co-branded site, we will still be the entity collecting your information, and our Privacy Policy will apply to that information. However, the privacy policy of our co-branding partner may still apply as well. You should read the individual privacy policies of our co-branding partners, as they may differ in some respects from ours. Reading these policies will help you to make an informed decision about whether to provide your information to a given site.
5. Do We Share Your Personal Information?
We will not share your personal information except: (a) for the primary purposes for which you provided it, such as to payment processors for donations, and as otherwise described in the Terms of Service (available here,
https://fundraiseup.com/terms/
), and as may reasonably or foreseeably be required to give effect to such primary purposes; (b) with your consent, or at your direction, including running analytics; (c) as may be required by law or as we think necessary to protect our organization or others from injury (e.g., in response to a court order or subpoena, in response to a law enforcement agency request, or when we believe that someone is causing, or is about to cause, injury to or interference with the rights or property of another); or (d) with persons or organizations with whom we contract to carry out internal operations or business activities (such as our cloud hosting provider, and our security auditors). With your knowledge and consent, we may share your personal information with our business partners.
We may also share aggregate information with others, including affiliated and non-affiliated organizations, including Customers, co-branding partners, and co-owners of the Site.
Finally, we may transfer your PII to a third party, or our successor-in-interest, in relation to, or in the event of, a merger, acquisition, sale of all or substantially all of our assets, reorganization, bankruptcy, or other change of control. After such disclosure or transfer, the third party or successor in interest may use the information in accordance with applicable law.
To the extent required by the GDPR, we utilize the EU Standard Contractual Clauses and UK International Data Transfer Addendum (together with the EU Standard Contractual Clauses, “Appropriate Safeguards”) to govern applicable international transfers of your data to ensure that they are properly protected.
Organizations
In our role as a data processor, we enable access to your data for organizations that utilize our product. Our relations are covered by Data Processing Agreements and Appropriate Safeguards, where applicable.
CRM Systems
We use CRM systems to effectively organize and maintain a record of our interactions with our customers and partners. In particular, we use services provided by HubSpot, Inc., Virtuous Software, Inc., Neon One, LLC, Salesforce, Inc., PartnerStack Inc.
Platforms for search of contact data of potential customers
We employ such platforms to streamline our marketing and outreach efforts by identifying and collecting contact information of individuals or businesses who may have expressed an interest in our services. This enables us to effectively reach out to potential customers and provide them with relevant information. In particular, we use services provided by ZoomInfo Technologies Inc., LinkedIn, Inc., Outreach.io.
Email verification and delivery services
Email verification services help us validate email addresses, reducing the likelihood of sending emails to non-existent or incorrect addresses. Email delivery services ensure that emails are sent reliably and securely. In particular, we use services provided by SparkPost, ZeroBounce, Lob.com, Inc.
Payment processors
We engage payment processors to securely process donations made by supporters. In particular, we use services provided by Gemini Trust Company, LLC, Crypto APIs, iDEAL BV, PayPal, Inc., Plaid Financial Ltd., Apple Inc., Stripe, Inc.
Hosting and databases
We utilize hosting services and database solutions to store and maintain the data necessary for the operation of our services and websites. In particular, we use services provided by Amazon Web Services, Inc., MongoDB, Inc., Microsoft, Inc., Twilio Inc., Hetzner Online GmbH, OVH Groupe SA, Clickhouse, Cloudflare, Inc.
Marketing and analytics
We collaborate with marketing and analytics partners to enhance our services, understand user behavior, and improve our marketing strategies. This includes tailoring content, advertisements, and user experiences to your preferences. In particular, we use services provided by Google LLC and ConvertFlow Inc.
Zoom, Inc.
The services are provided by Zoom Video Communications, Inc. Address: 55 Almaden Boulevard, 6th Floor, San Jose, California 95113, USA. Relevant privacy policy of Zoom. Unfortunately, the country of data recipient doesn’t ensure an adequate level of protection of your personal data. Standard Contractual Clauses are used to transfer your data to ensure that they are properly protected.
Tally.so
We use the service to process responses to our forms. Tally is based in Belgium (EU). Relevant Privacy Policy.
After becoming a user of the Service, you may revise or edit your information through your account or by sending an email to
legal@fundraiseup.com
. For instructions on how you can further access your personal information that we have collected, or how to correct errors in such information, please send an e-mail to
legal@fundraiseup.com
. We will also promptly stop using your information and remove it from our servers and database at any time upon your e-mail request. To protect your privacy and security, we will take reasonable steps to help verify your identity before granting access, making corrections or removing your information.
6. How Do We Store and Protect Your Information?
After receiving your personal information, we will store it on our servers for future use. We have physical, electronic, and managerial procedures in place to safeguard and help prevent unauthorized access, maintain data security, and correctly use the information we collect. Unfortunately, no data transmission over the internet or data storage solution can ever be completely secure. As a result, although we take industry-standard steps to protect your information (e.g., strong encryption), we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to or receive from us or that we store on our or our service providers' systems.
Please note that we encrypt any PII in our possession and are compliant with the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) v. 3.2 under the Self-Assessment Questionnaire (SAQ) A standard. Further, all data transfers are through secure http protocol (HTTPS), and as such are encrypted. We also restrict access to PII to key employees and log all instances of access to PII. Our Payment Processor is fully PCI-Compliant and encrypts all payment transactions using Secure Socket Layer (SSL) technology.
If you are visiting the Site from outside of the USA, you understand that your connection will be through and to servers located in the USA, and the information you provide will be securely stored in our servers and internal systems located within the USA.
We store your personal information until you request to discontinue the Service or that we otherwise remove such information from our services, at which point we will remove all related PII from our possession, unless we are required to retain some or all of it in order to comply with applicable law. We store our logs and other technical records indefinitely.
7. How do we use cookies and other network technologies?
To enhance your online experience with us, our web pages may presently or in the future use "cookies." Cookies are text files that our web server may place on your hard disk to store your preferences. Cookies, by themselves, do not tell us your e-mail address or other PII unless you choose to provide this information to us. Once you choose to provide PII, however, this information may be linked to the data stored in the cookie. Although it may be possible to turn off the collection of cookies through your device or browser, certain features of the Services may not function properly without the aid of cookies.
Our Service uses Google Analytics, provided by Google LLC, 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, CA 94043 (“Google”). Google Analytics uses cookies and similar technologies to collect and analyze information about use of the Services and report on activities and trends. This service may collect information regarding the use of other websites, apps and online resources. For more information on how Google uses data when you use our Site or Service, please follow this link:
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. You may be able to opt-out of some or all of Google Analytics features by downloading the Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on, available at,
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout
. For more information about interest-based ads, or to opt out of having your web browsing information used for behavioral advertising purposes, please visit
http://optout.aboutads.info
.
We also use Google’s marketing services, which allow us to display ads in a more targeted manned in order to present ads of interest to the users. This is accomplished through Google’s use of cookies, and all ads are displayed/served to the owner and/or device to which the relevant cookie pertains, whether or not that cookie is linked to any PII. For more information about Google’s use of data for marketing purposes, please see the summary page:
https://www.google.com/policies/technologies/ads
. Google’s privacy policy is available at
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
. If you wish to object to interest-based advertising by Google marketing services, you can do so using the settings and opt-out options provided by Google:
http://www.google.com/ads/preferences
.
Fundraise Up or our service providers may also use "pixel tags," "web beacons," "clear GIFs" or similar means (collectively, "Pixel Tags") in connection with some Fundraise Up Site pages and HTML-formatted email messages for purposes of, among other things, compiling aggregate statistics about website usage and response rates. A Pixel Tag is an electronic image, often a single pixel (1x1), that is ordinarily not visible to website visitors and may be associated with cookies on visitors’ hard drives. Pixel Tags allow us and our service providers to count users who have visited certain pages of the Fundraise Up Site, to deliver customized services, and to help determine the effectiveness of promotional or advertising campaigns. When used in HTML-formatted email messages, Pixel Tags can inform the sender of the email whether and when the email has been opened.
Our Service uses the “Custom Audience pixel” of Facebook, Inc., 1 Hacker Way, Menlo Park, CA 94025, USA (“Facebook”) on our website. This allows user behavior to be tracked after they have been redirected to the provider’s website by clicking on a Facebook ad. This enables us to measure the effectiveness of Facebook ads for statistical and market research purposes. The data collected in this way is anonymous to us, i.e. we do not see the personal data of individual users. However, this data is stored and processed by Facebook, which is why we are informing you, based on our knowledge of the situation. Facebook may link this information to your Facebook account and also use it for its own promotional purposes, in accordance with Facebook’s Data Policy
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
. You can allow Facebook and its partners to place ads on and off Facebook. A cookie may also be stored on your computer for these purposes. The legal basis for the use of this service is Art. 6 paragraph 1 sentence 1 letter f GDPR. You can object to the collection of your data by Facebook pixel, or to the use of your data for the purpose of displaying Facebook ads by contacting the following address:
https://www.facebook.com/settings?tab=ads
.
As you use the internet, you leave a trail of electronic information at each website you visit. This information, which is sometimes referred to as "clickstream data”, can be collected and stored by a website’s server. Clickstream data can reveal the type of computer and browsing software you use and the address of the website from which you linked to the Fundraise Up Site. We may use clickstream data as a form of non-personally identifiable information to determine how much time visitors spend on each page of our Site, how visitors navigate through the Site, and how we may tailor our web pages to better meet the needs of visitors. We will only use this information to improve our site.
Do Not Track
. At present, the Site does not specifically respond to browser do-not-track signals.
8. Collection of Information by Others
Our Terms of Service (available here,
https://fundraiseup.com/terms/
) may identify certain third-party websites to which we may provide links, and that you may click on our Site. Please check the privacy policies of these other websites to learn how they collect, use, store and share information that you may submit to them or that they collect.
9. ‘European Union’ Privacy Rights
If you currently reside in the EEA, the GDPR applies to your PII and you are a Data Subject. The GDPR requires that we have a legal basis to process your PII.
As a controller, we process your PII under one or more of the following legal bases:
Processing is necessary for our legitimate interests (or those of a third party) and your interests and fundamental rights do not override those interests;
To perform the contract that we are about to enter with you (e.g. our Terms of Service);
To comply with a legal obligation; and/or
If we have your consent to do so.
When we are acting in our capacity as a processor, the non-profit organization with whom you are interacting, and/or donating to, is responsible for the legal basis (or bases) pursuant to which we process your PII. For more information on what legal bases are relied upon, please consult the privacy policy of the applicable non-profit organization.
Under the GDPR, as a Data Subject you have certain rights. They are:
The right to be informed
. This is your right to be informed about what we are processing, why, and who else the data may be passed to.
The right of access
. This is your right to see what data about you is held by us.
The right to rectification
. This is the right to have your data corrected or amended if what is held is incorrect in some way.
The right to erasure
. This is the right to have your personal data to be deleted in the event that such data is no longer required for the purposes it was collected for, your consent for the processing of the data is withdrawn, or the data is being unlawfully processed.
The right to restrict processing
. This is the right to ask for a temporary halt to processing of your personal data, such as in the case where a dispute or legal case has to be concluded, or the data is being corrected.
The right to data portability
. This is the right to ask for your personal data to be provided to you in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format.
The right to object
. This is the right to object to further processing your personal data if such processing is inconsistent with the primary purposes for which it was collected.
Rights in relation to automated decision making and profiling
. This is the right to not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing. The service does not engage in automated decision making and profiling.
You can find instructions for enforcing some of these rights below. Otherwise, if you wish to find out more about these rights, please contact us at
legal@fundraiseup.com
.
10. Children and Young People’s Information
We do not knowingly collect any information from any minors, and we comply with all applicable privacy laws including the GDPR, the CCPA, USA Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act (“COPPA”) and associated Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”) rules for collecting personal information from minors. Please see the FTC’s website (www.ftc.gov) for more information. If you have concerns about this Site, wish to find out if your child has accessed our services, or wish to remove your child’s personal information from our servers, please contact us at
legal@fundraiseup.com
. Our Site will not knowingly accept personal information from anyone under 13 years old in violation of applicable laws, without consent of a parent or guardian. In the event that we discover that a child under the age of 13 has provided PII to us, we will make efforts to delete the child’s information in accordance with COPPA. If you believe that your child under 13 has gained access to our Site without your permission, please contact us at
legal@fundraiseup.com
.
11. California Privacy Rights
To the extent that the CCPA applies to our practices with respect to Personal Information, and you currently reside in California, the CCPA provides you, as a Consumer, with certain rights.
Right to Know
Consumers have the right to request that we disclose Personal Information we have collected about them in the previous 12 months including, but not limited to, the categories of information collected by us, the source(s) of such information by category, and the purpose for collecting such information. This right may not be exercised more than twice in a 12-month period. In the previous 12 months, we have collected the following categories of Personal Information about consumers:
Identifiers. Identifiers can be your name, mailing address, social security number, unique personal identifiers (device identifier, IP Address, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, mobile ad identifiers), account names, and similar information; We collect the identifiers from the consumers themselves, third parties, and automatic means;
Personal Information Under the California Customer Records Law (Cal. Civ. Code §1798.80) (“CCRLPI”);
Commercial Information. Commercial information includes records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained or considered, or other purchased or consuming histories or tendencies;
Geolocation Data. Such geolocation data may include GPS data;
Employment Information. Such employment information can include your employment history;
Internet/Network Activity. Internet Activity Information includes browsing history, cookies, search history and a consumer’s interaction with a website; and
Inferences drawn from any other category of Personal Information.
We collect Personal Information in the above categories from the consumers themselves, other users of the Service, service providers and business partners, third parties, and by automatic means for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy, and as required to comply with applicable law.
Right to Know
. As a Consumer, you also have the right to request that we tell you which of your Personal Information we have disclosed for a business purpose, Sold (as defined in the CCPA) in the previous 12 months. With respect to Personal Information being disclosed for a business purpose, the consumer shall receive the categories of information disclosed and the types of entities they have been disclosed to. This right may not be exercised more than twice in a 12-month period. For Personal Information being Sold, this includes the categories of information being sold and the categories of third parties to whom it is being sold. In the past 12 months, we have disclosed Personal Information falling under the following categories of Personal Information:
Identifiers;
CCRLPI;
Internet/Network Activity; and
Commercial Information.
We disclose Personal Information in the preceding categories to the consumers themselves, to other users/third parties as the consumer may direct, service providers, third parties, and government/law enforcement agencies for the purpose it was provided/provision of Services, to comply with applicable law, and as otherwise described above in this Privacy Policy.
IN THE PAST 12 MONTHS WE HAVE NOT SOLD, AND DURING THE PERIOD OF TIME WHICH THIS PRIVACY POLICY IS POSTED WE SHALL NOT SELL, THE PERSONAL INFORMATION OF ANY CONSUMER, INCLUDING MINORS UNDER THE AGE OF 16.
Right to Opt-Out
. You have the right to opt out of the Sale of your Personal Information, if applicable. We have not, in the past twelve (12) months, Sold your Personal Information and do not anticipate doing so during the time this version of the Privacy Policy is posted.
Right to Deletion
. You also have the right to request the deletion of the Personal Information that we have collected from you at any time. However, we may not be required to comply with such request under several circumstances including, but not limited to, when the data is necessary for the underlying transaction, to comply with applicable law, to detect security incidents, to debug glitches, and for our internal purposes.
Right to be Free from Discrimination
. In the event that you exercise one of your rights under the CCPA, you will not be discriminated by us in any way, including by the denial of goods or services, providing you a different level of goods or services, or charging you different prices or rates for the goods or services, unless the change in price is reasonably related to the value you receive from your Personal Information.
12. Notice to Nevada Residents
If you are a Nevada resident, we do not “sell” your “covered information” as such terms are defined in the Nevada Privacy of Information Collected on the Internet from Consumers Act as amended by Nevada Revised Statutes Chapter 603A (“Nevada Privacy Law” or “NPL”). Though we do not sell your covered information, as someone that is subject to the NPL, you have a right of access in relation to the covered information of yours that we have or process, including why we process it, and other parties with whom we may share such information. If you would like to tell us not to sell your information in the future, please email us at
legal@fundraiseup.com
with your name, postal address, telephone number, and email address with “Nevada Do Not sell” in the subject line.
13. Exercising Your Rights
You may submit your requests to exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy by emailing us at
legal@fundraiseup.com
(please include “Privacy Rights Request” in the subject line).
We will acknowledge receipt of your request within 10 business days of receiving it, and will do our very best to respond within 30 calendar days of receipt of your request. If we are unable to provide our response within the 30 days, we shall notify you as soon as we become aware of the possible delay and provide an explanation of why additional time is needed to respond.
Before we respond to any requests relating to your personal information, we may take steps to reasonably verify the identity of the person making the request (“Requestor”) to make sure it’s you, or your authorized agent. We do this to this avoid disclosing your information to third parties and bad actors, not to inconvenience you in any way. The more sensitive the information subject to the request, the more rigorous the verification may be. If the identity of the Requestor cannot be reasonably verified, either as the consumer or their agent, then in order to protect that consumer, we shall not disclose the personal information requested.
14. Changes to this Policy
Because our business needs may change over time, we reserve the right to modify this Privacy Policy. If at any time in the future we plan to use your PII in a way that differs from this Privacy Policy, we will revise this Privacy Policy as appropriate. In the event of a change to our Privacy Policy, we will email the updated policy to the email address that you provided to us. Your continued use of the Fundraise Up Service following our notice of changes to this Privacy Policy means you accept such changes. Please refer to the “Effective Date” above to see when this Policy was last updated.
15. Our Contact Information
If you have any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy, you may contact us as follows:
Fundraise Up Inc.
114 8th Street
Brooklyn, New York 11215
USA
legal@fundraiseup.com
16. Australian Regulator
If you wish to discuss our privacy practices with the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner, such office may be reached as follows:
Office of the Australian Information Commissioner
GPO Box 5288
Sydney NSW 2001
Australia
Aus. Tel: 1300 363 992
Int’l Tel: + 61 2 6123 5145
Copyright © Fundraise Up Inc. All rights reserved. The Service is the property of Fundraise Up, and is protected by United States and international copyright, trademark, and other applicable laws. This includes the content, appearance, and design of the Service, as well as the trademarks, product names, graphics, logos, service names, slogans, colors, and designs.